Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(b) "De minimis indirect interest" means ownership of registered equities in a
publicly traded company, and the ownership interest is either:
1. Less than five percent (5%) of any class of registered equities or less
than five percent (5%) in the aggregate in multiple classes of
registered equities; or
2. A noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled by a company that is
both registered with the United States Securities and Exchange
Commission as an investment adviser under the Investment Advisers
Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. sec. 80b-1 et seq., as amended, and is not a
foreign entity;
(c) "Fiduciary" has the same meaning as in KRS 131.010;
(d) "Foreign agent" has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. sec. 1839;
(e) "Foreign business" has the same meaning as in 26 C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-5;
(f) "Foreign principal" means a nonresident alien individual, foreign
business, foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary who has a legal relationship
with or is legally bound to take instruction from or execute decisions for the
government of any proscribed country referenced in 15 C.F.R. sec. 791.4, as
amended;
(g) "Nonresident alien individual" has the same meaning as in 26 C.F.R. sec.
1.871-2; and
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/3/2025 10:13 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 180
(h) "Trustee" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.405.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a foreign principal
shall not directly or indirectly own, have a controlling interest in, or acquire by
purchase, grant, devise, or descent any interest, except a de minimis indirect
interest, in real property located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(3) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns or acquires any interest in real
property located in this Commonwealth before the effective date of this Act may
continue to own or hold the real property, but shall not purchase or otherwise
acquire by grant, devise, or descent any additional real property located in the
Commonwealth.
(4) (a) A foreign principal shall register with the cabinet if the foreign principal
owned or acquired an interest, other than a de minimis indirect interest, in
real property located in this Commonwealth before the effective date of this
Act. The cabinet shall, by promulgation of an administrative regulation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish a form for the registration
required under this subsection. The form shall be available on the cabinet's
website and shall include, at a minimum, the following:
1. The name of the owner of the real property; and
2. The address of the real property, the property valuation
administrator's parcel identification number, and the property's legal
description.
(b) A foreign principal that fails to timely file a registration with the cabinet
shall be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
day that the registration is not timely filed or is incomplete. A foreign
principal shall register a property interest owned before the effective date of
this Act by December 31, 2025. The registration shall be considered
untimely after January 31, 2026. The cabinet may place a lien against any
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/3/2025 10:13 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 180
unregistered real property for the unpaid balance of any penalties assessed
under this paragraph.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a foreign principal may
acquire real property or any interest in real property located in this
Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this Act by devise or descent,
through the enforcement of security interests, or through the collection of debts,
provided that the foreign principal sells, transfers, or otherwise divests itself of
the real property within three (3) years after acquiring the real property.
(6) If a person has reason to believe that a violation of this section may have
occurred, the person may refer evidence of noncompliance to the Office of the
Attorney General, who shall investigate the evidence for violations of this section.
The Office of the Attorney General may bring an action pursuant to KRS Chapter
15 to enforce the provisions of this section.
(7) (a) If the court finds that real property has been purchased or acquired in
violation of this section, then the court shall declare the real property
escheated to the Commonwealth and order the sale of the real property in
the manner provided by law for the judicial foreclosure of a mortgage on
real estate for default of payment. After the Office of the Attorney General
has been reimbursed for all actual costs incurred from the enforcement of
this provision, the proceeds of the sale of the real property pursuant to this
paragraph through judicial foreclosure shall be disbursed in the following
order:
1. Payment of delinquent ad valorem taxes;
2. Payment to mortgage and other lien holders, in the priority determined
by the court; and
3. Deposit in the budget reserve trust fund.
(b) At any time during the proceeding, the Office of the Attorney General may
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/3/2025 10:13 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 180
seek an ex parte order of seizure of the real property upon a showing that
the defendant's control of the real property constitutes a clear and present
danger to the state.
Section 2. KRS 381.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any officer who certifies an abstract in violation of KRS 381.240 or 381.250 shall
be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500) for each offense. In addition to such fine, the officer shall be liable
personally and on his official bond to the person in possession of the lands, and to
any and all other persons aggrieved thereby, to an action for damages sustained by
such persons by reason of such certificate.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 381.690 to 381.710 shall be
fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) for each offense.
(3) Any person who fails to comply with the provisions of KRS 381.780 shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25) for each offense.
Each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.
(4) Any person or corporation who violates KRS 381.697 shall be subject to a fine of
not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars
($250).
(5) Any person who fails to comply with any of the provisions of KRS 381.860 may be
fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each offense, and the
county attorney and the Attorney General may prosecute the violator. In addition to
the fine, the violator may be liable personally to any and all persons aggrieved by
the violation and subject to an action for damages, plus court costs and plaintiffs'
attorneys' fees.
(6) (a) A foreign principal who purchases or acquires real property or any interest
in real property in violation of Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/3/2025 10:13 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 180
D felony.
(b) Any person who knowingly sells real property or any interest in real
property to a foreign principal in violation of Section 1 of this Act shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
Section 3. KRS 381.320 is amended to read as follows:
Any alien, not an enemy, may take and hold any personal property except chattels real. If
such alien resides within this Commonwealth[state] he or she may take and hold, subject
to the limitations set forth in Section 1 of this Act, any lands for the purposes of
residence, or of occupation by him or her or his or her servants, or for the purpose of any
business, trade, or manufacture, for as long as he or she remains a resident of the
Commonwealth[state]. An alien so taking and holding shall have like rights, remedies,
and exemptions concerning such property as if he or she were a citizen of the United
States.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/3/2025 10:13 AM Jacketed